Utah statutes.
78B-6-1305.   Disclaimer or default by defendant -- Costs.
The plaintiff may not recover costs of the action if:
(1)  the defendant disclaims in his answer any interest or estate in the
property; or
(2)  allows judgment to be taken against him by refusing to answer.
